District of Columbia statutes.
15-313

Levy on equitable interest in chattels pledged.

The interest of the debtor in personal chattels lawfully pledged for the payment of a debt or performance of a contract, or held by a trustee, and in which the debtor’s interest is only equitable, may be levied upon in the hands of the pledgee or trustee without disturbing the possession of the latter, and the lien thus obtained may be enforced by civil action. In other cases of equitable interest of the judgment debtor in personal chattels execution may also be levied thereon and the lien thus obtained may be enforced by civil action.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 526, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 15-313.
1973 Ed., § 15-313.